Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0125.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 30. (1) "Taxable income" means, for a person other than a corporation, estate, or trust, adjusted gross income as defined in the internal revenue code subject to the following adjustments under this section: (a) Add gross interest income and dividends derived from obligations or securities of states other than Michigan, in the same amount that has been excluded from adjusted gross income less related expenses not deducted in computing adjusted gross income because of section 265(a)(1) of the internal revenue code. (b) Add taxes on or measured by income to the extent the taxes have been deducted in arriving at adjusted gross income including any direct or indirect allocated share of taxes paid by a flow-through entity under part 4. (c) Add losses on the sale or exchange of obligations of the United States government, the income of which this state is prohibited from subjecting to a net income tax, to the extent that the loss has been deducted in arriving at adjusted gross income. (d) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, income derived from obligations, or the sale or exchange of obligations, of the United States government that this state is prohibited by law from subjecting to a net income tax, reduced by any interest on indebtedness incurred in carrying the obligations and by any expenses incurred in the production of that income to the extent that the expenses, including amortizable bond premiums, were deducted in arriving at adjusted gross income. (e) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, the following: (i) Compensation, including retirement or pension benefits, received for services in the Armed Forces of the United States. (ii) Retirement or pension benefits under the railroad retirement act of 1974, 45 USC 231 to 231v. (iii) Beginning January 1, 2012, retirement Retirement or pension benefits received for services in the Michigan National Guard. (f) Deduct the following to the extent included in adjusted gross income subject to the limitations and restrictions set forth in subsection (9), (10), or (11), as applicable: (i) Retirement or pension benefits received from a federal public retirement system or from a public retirement system of or created by this state or a political subdivision of this state. (ii) Retirement or pension benefits received from a public retirement system of or created by another state or any of its political subdivisions if the income tax laws of the other state permit a similar deduction or exemption or a reciprocal deduction or exemption of a retirement or pension benefit received from a public retirement system of or created by this state or any of the political subdivisions of this state. (iii) Social Security benefits as defined in section 86 of the internal revenue code. (iv) Beginning on and after January 1, 2007, retirement or pension benefits not deductible under subparagraph (i) or subdivision (e) from any other retirement or pension system or benefits from a retirement annuity policy in which payments are made for life to a senior citizen, to a maximum of $42,240.00 for a single return and $84,480.00 for a joint return. The maximum amounts allowed under this subparagraph shall be reduced by the amount of the deduction for retirement or pension benefits claimed under subparagraph (i) or subdivision (e) and by the amount of a deduction claimed under subdivision (p). For the 2008 tax year and each tax year after 2008, the maximum amounts allowed under this subparagraph shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in the United States Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding calendar year. The department shall annualize the amounts provided in this subparagraph as necessary. (v) The amount determined to be the section 22 amount eligible for the elderly and the permanently and totally disabled credit provided in section 22 of the internal revenue code. (g) Adjustments resulting from the application of section 271. (h) Adjustments with respect to estate and trust income as provided in section 36. (i) Adjustments resulting from the allocation and apportionment provisions of chapter 3. (j) Deduct the following payments made by the taxpayer in the tax year: (i) The amount of a charitable contribution made to the advance tuition payment fund created under section 9 of the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1429. (ii) The amount of payment made under an advance tuition payment contract as provided in the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442. (iii) The amount of payment made under a contract with a private sector investment manager that meets all of the following criteria: (A) The contract is certified and approved by the board of directors of the Michigan education trust to provide equivalent benefits and rights to purchasers and beneficiaries as an advance tuition payment contract as described in subparagraph (ii). (B) The contract applies only for a state institution of higher education as defined in the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, or a community or junior college in Michigan. (C) The contract provides for enrollment by the contract's qualified beneficiary in not less than 4 years after the date on which the contract is entered into. (D) The contract is entered into after either of the following: (I) The purchaser has had the purchaser's offer to enter into an advance tuition payment contract rejected by the board of directors of the Michigan education trust, if the board determines that the trust cannot accept an unlimited number of enrollees upon an actuarially sound basis. (II) The board of directors of the Michigan education trust determines that the trust can accept an unlimited number of enrollees upon an actuarially sound basis. (k) If an advance tuition payment contract under the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, or another contract for which the payment was deductible under subdivision (j) is terminated and the qualified beneficiary under that contract does not attend a university, college, junior or community college, or other institution of higher education, add the amount of a refund received by the taxpayer as a result of that termination or the amount of the deduction taken under subdivision (j) for payment made under that contract, whichever is less. (l) Deduct from the taxable income of a purchaser the amount included as income to the purchaser under the internal revenue code after the advance tuition payment contract entered into under the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, is terminated because the qualified beneficiary attends an institution of postsecondary education other than either a state institution of higher education or an institution of postsecondary education located outside this state with which a state institution of higher education has reciprocity. (m) Add, to the extent deducted in determining adjusted gross income, the net operating loss deduction under section 172 of the internal revenue code. (n) Deduct a net operating loss deduction for the taxable year as determined under section 172 of the internal revenue code subject to the modifications under section 172(b)(2) of the internal revenue code and subject to the allocation and apportionment provisions of chapter 3 for the taxable year in which the loss was incurred. (o) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, benefits from a discriminatory self-insurance medical expense reimbursement plan. (p) Beginning on and after January 1, 2007, subject to any limitation provided in this subdivision, a taxpayer who is a senior citizen may deduct to the extent included in adjusted gross income, interest, dividends, and capital gains received in the tax year not to exceed $9,420.00 for a single return and $18,840.00 for a joint return. The maximum amounts allowed under this subdivision shall be reduced by the amount of a deduction claimed for retirement or pension benefits under subdivision (e) or a deduction claimed under subdivision (f)(i), (ii), (iv), or (v). For the 2008 tax year and each tax year after 2008, the maximum amounts allowed under this subdivision shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in the United States Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding calendar year. The department shall annualize the amounts provided in this subdivision as necessary. Beginning January 1, 2012, the The deduction under this subdivision is not available to a senior citizen born after 1945. (q) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, all of the following: (i) The amount of a refund received in the tax year based on taxes paid under this part and any direct or indirect allocated share of a refund received by a flow-through entity under part 4. (ii) The amount of a refund received in the tax year based on taxes paid under the city income tax act, 1964 PA 284, MCL 141.501 to 141.787. (iii) The amount of a credit received in the tax year based on a claim filed under sections 520 and 522 to the extent that the taxes used to calculate the credit were not used to reduce adjusted gross income for a prior year. (r) Add the amount paid by the state on behalf of the taxpayer in the tax year to repay the outstanding principal on a loan taken on which the taxpayer defaulted that was to fund an advance tuition payment contract entered into under the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, if the cost of the advance tuition payment contract was deducted under subdivision (j) and was financed with a Michigan education trust secured loan. (s) Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, any amount, and any interest earned on that amount, received in the tax year by a taxpayer who is a Holocaust victim as a result of a settlement of claims against any entity or individual for any recovered asset pursuant to the German act regulating unresolved property claims, also known as Gesetz zur Regelung offener Vermogensfragen, as a result of the settlement of the action entitled In re: Holocaust victim assets litigation, CV-96-4849, CV-96-5161, and CV-97-0461 (E.D. NY), or as a result of any similar action if the income and interest are not commingled in any way with and are kept separate from all other funds and assets of the taxpayer. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Holocaust victim" means a person, or the heir or beneficiary of that person, who was persecuted by Nazi Germany or any Axis regime during any period from 1933 to 1945. (ii) "Recovered asset" means any asset of any type and any interest earned on that asset, including, but not limited to, bank deposits, insurance proceeds, or artwork owned by a Holocaust victim during the period from 1920 to 1945, withheld from that Holocaust victim from and after 1945, and not recovered, returned, or otherwise compensated to the Holocaust victim until after 1993. (t) Deduct all of the following: (i) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross income, contributions made by the taxpayer in the tax year less qualified withdrawals made in the tax year from education savings accounts, calculated on a per education savings account basis, pursuant to the Michigan education savings program act, 2000 PA 161, MCL 390.1471 to 390.1486, not to exceed a total deduction of $5,000.00 for a single return or $10,000.00 for a joint return per tax year. The amount calculated under this subparagraph for each education savings account shall not be less than zero. (ii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income, interest earned in the tax year on the contributions to the taxpayer's education savings accounts if the contributions were deductible under subparagraph (i). (iii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income, distributions that are qualified withdrawals from an education savings account to the designated beneficiary of that education savings account. (u) Add, to the extent not included in adjusted gross income, the amount of money withdrawn by the taxpayer in the tax year from education savings accounts, not to exceed the total amount deducted under subdivision (t) in the tax year and all previous tax years, if the withdrawal was not a qualified withdrawal as provided in the Michigan education savings program act, 2000 PA 161, MCL 390.1471 to 390.1486. This subdivision does not apply to withdrawals that are less than the sum of all contributions made to an education savings account in all previous tax years for which no deduction was claimed under subdivision (t), less any contributions for which no deduction was claimed under subdivision (t) that were withdrawn in all previous tax years. (v) A taxpayer who is a resident tribal member may deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, all nonbusiness income earned or received in the tax year and during the period in which an agreement entered into between the taxpayer's tribe and this state pursuant to section 30c of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30c, is in full force and effect. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Business income" means business income as defined in section 4 and apportioned under chapter 3. (ii) "Nonbusiness income" means nonbusiness income as defined in section 14 and, to the extent not included in business income, all of the following: (A) All income derived from wages whether the wages are earned within the agreement area or outside of the agreement area. (B) All interest and passive dividends. (C) All rents and royalties derived from real property located within the agreement area. (D) All rents and royalties derived from tangible personal property, to the extent the personal property is utilized within the agreement area. (E) Capital gains from the sale or exchange of real property located within the agreement area. (F) Capital gains from the sale or exchange of tangible personal property located within the agreement area at the time of sale. (G) Capital gains from the sale or exchange of intangible personal property. (H) All pension income and benefits, including, but not limited to, distributions from a 401(k) plan, individual retirement accounts under section 408 of the internal revenue code, or a defined contribution plan, or payments from a defined benefit plan. (I) All per capita payments by the tribe to resident tribal members, without regard to the source of payment. (J) All gaming winnings. (iii) "Resident tribal member" means an individual who meets all of the following criteria: (A) Is an enrolled member of a federally recognized tribe. (B) The individual's tribe has an agreement with this state pursuant to section 30c of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30c, that is in full force and effect. (C) The individual's principal place of residence is located within the agreement area as designated in the agreement under sub-subparagraph (B). (w) Eliminate all of the following: (i) Income from producing oil and gas to the extent included in adjusted gross income. (ii) Expenses of producing oil and gas to the extent deducted in arriving at adjusted gross income. (x) Deduct all of the following: (i) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross income, contributions made by the taxpayer in the tax year less qualified withdrawals made in the tax year from an ABLE savings account, pursuant to the Michigan achieving a better life experience (ABLE) program act, 2015 PA 160, MCL 206.981 to 206.997, not to exceed a total deduction of $5,000.00 for a single return or $10,000.00 for a joint return per tax year. The amount calculated under this subparagraph for an ABLE savings account shall not be less than zero. (ii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income, interest earned in the tax year on the contributions to the taxpayer's ABLE savings account if the contributions were deductible under subparagraph (i). (iii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income, distributions that are qualified withdrawals from an ABLE savings account to the designated beneficiary of that ABLE savings account. (y) Add, to the extent not included in adjusted gross income, the amount of money withdrawn by the taxpayer in the tax year from an ABLE savings account, not to exceed the total amount deducted under subdivision (x) in the tax year and all previous tax years, if the withdrawal was not a qualified withdrawal as provided in the Michigan achieving a better life experience (ABLE) program act, 2015 PA 160, MCL 206.981 to 206.997. This subdivision does not apply to withdrawals that are less than the sum of all contributions made to an ABLE savings account in all previous tax years for which no deduction was claimed under subdivision (x), less any contributions for which no deduction was claimed under subdivision (x) that were withdrawn in all previous tax years. (z) For tax years that begin after December 31, 2018, deduct, Deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, compensation received in the tax year pursuant to the wrongful imprisonment compensation act, 2016 PA 343, MCL 691.1751 to 691.1757. (aa) For the 2016, 2017, 2018, and 2019 tax years and for each tax year that begins on and after January 1, 2025, a taxpayer who is a disabled veteran may deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, income reported on a federal income tax form 1099-C that is attributable to the cancellation or discharge of a student loan by the United States Department of Education pursuant to the total and permanent disability discharge program, 34 CFR 685.213. As used in this subdivision, "disabled veteran" means an individual who meets either of the following criteria: (i) Has been determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to be permanently and totally disabled as a result of military service and entitled to veterans' benefits at the 100% rate. (ii) Has been rated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as individually unemployable. (bb) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2021, and subject to the limitation under this subdivision, deduct, to the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross income, wagering losses deducted under section 165(d) of the internal revenue code on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the same tax year. For a nonresident, only wagering losses that are attributable to wagering transactions placed at or through a casino or licensed race meeting located in this state may be deducted and must not exceed the gains on wagering transactions allocated to this state under section 110(2)(d). As used in this subdivision, "casino" and "licensed race meeting" mean those terms as defined in section 110. (cc) Except as otherwise provided under subparagraph (i), for tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2022, deduct all of the following: (i) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross income, contributions made by the taxpayer in the tax year less qualified withdrawals made in the tax year from a first-time home buyer savings account, pursuant to the Michigan first-time home buyer savings program act, 2022 PA 6, MCL 565.1001 to 565.1013, not to exceed a total deduction of $5,000.00 for a single return or $10,000.00 for a joint return per tax year. The amount calculated under this subparagraph for a first-time home buyer savings account shall not be less than zero. The deduction under this subparagraph does not apply for tax years that begin after December 31, 2026. (ii) To the extent not deducted in determining adjusted gross income, interest earned in the tax year on the contributions to the taxpayer's first-time home buyer savings account. (iii) To the extent included in adjusted gross income, distributions that are qualified withdrawals from a first-time home buyer savings account to the qualified beneficiary of that savings account. (dd) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2022, add, to the extent not included in adjusted gross income, the amount of money withdrawn by the taxpayer in the tax year from a first-time home buyer savings account, not to exceed the total amount deducted under subdivision (cc) in the tax year and all previous tax years, if the withdrawal was not a qualified withdrawal as provided in the Michigan first-time home buyer savings program act, 2022 PA 6, MCL 565.1001 to 565.1013. This subdivision does not apply to withdrawals that are less than the sum of all contributions made to a first-time home buyer savings account in all previous tax years for which no deduction was claimed under subdivision (cc), less any contributions for which no deduction was claimed under subdivision (cc) that were withdrawn in all previous tax years. (ee) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2026, deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, the amount paid in overtime compensation to the taxpayer during the tax year that was required to be paid by the taxpayer's employer under section 4a of the improved workforce opportunity wage act, 2018 PA 337, MCL 408.934a. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), and section 30a, a personal exemption of $3,700.00 multiplied by the number of personal and dependency exemptions shall be subtracted in the calculation that determines taxable income. The number of personal and dependency exemptions allowed shall be determined as follows: (a) Each taxpayer may claim 1 personal exemption. However, if a joint return is not made by the taxpayer and the taxpayer's spouse, the taxpayer may claim a personal exemption for the spouse if the spouse, for the calendar year in which the taxable year of the taxpayer begins, does not have any gross income and is not the dependent of another taxpayer. (b) A taxpayer may claim a dependency exemption for each individual who is a dependent of the taxpayer for the tax year. (c) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2019, a A taxpayer may claim an additional exemption under this subsection in the tax year for which the taxpayer has a certificate of stillbirth from the department of health and human services as provided under section 2834 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.2834. (3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), a single additional exemption determined as follows shall be subtracted in the calculation that determines taxable income in each of the following circumstances: (a) $1,800.00 for each taxpayer and every dependent of the taxpayer who is a deaf person as defined in section 2 of the deaf persons' interpreters act, 1982 PA 204, MCL 393.502; a paraplegic, a quadriplegic, or a hemiplegic; a person who is blind as defined in section 504; or a person who is totally and permanently disabled as defined in section 522. When a dependent of a taxpayer files an annual return under this part, the taxpayer or dependent of the taxpayer, but not both, may claim the additional exemption allowed under this subdivision. (b) For tax years beginning after 2007, $250.00 for each taxpayer and every dependent of the taxpayer who is a qualified disabled veteran. When a dependent of a taxpayer files an annual return under this part, the taxpayer or dependent of the taxpayer, but not both, may claim the additional exemption allowed under this subdivision. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Qualified disabled veteran" means a veteran with a service-connected disability. (ii) "Service-connected disability" means a disability incurred or aggravated in the line of duty in the active military, naval, or air service as described in 38 USC 101(16). (iii) "Veteran" means an individual who served in the active military, naval, marine, coast guard, or air service and who was discharged or released from the individual's service with an honorable or general discharge. (4) An individual with respect to whom a deduction under subsection (2) is allowable to another taxpayer during the tax year is not entitled to an exemption for purposes of subsection (2), but may subtract $1,500.00 in the calculation that determines taxable income for a tax year. (5) A nonresident or a part-year resident is allowed that proportion of an exemption or deduction allowed under subsection (2), (3), or (4) that the taxpayer's portion of adjusted gross income from Michigan sources bears to the taxpayer's total adjusted gross income. (6) In calculating taxable income, a taxpayer shall not subtract from adjusted gross income the amount of prizes won by the taxpayer under the McCauley-Traxler-Law-Bowman-McNeely lottery act, 1972 PA 239, MCL 432.1 to 432.47. (7) For each tax year beginning on and after January 1, 2013, the personal exemption allowed under subsection (2) shall be adjusted by multiplying the exemption for the tax year beginning in 2012 by a fraction, the numerator of which is the United States Consumer Price Index for the state fiscal year ending in the tax year prior to the tax year for which the adjustment is being made and the denominator of which is the United States Consumer Price Index for the 2010-2011 state fiscal year. For the 2022 tax year and each tax year after 2022, the adjusted amount determined under this subsection shall be increased by an additional $600.00. The resultant product shall be rounded to the nearest $100.00 increment. For each tax year, the exemptions allowed under subsection (3) shall be adjusted by multiplying the exemption amount under subsection (3) for the tax year by a fraction, the numerator of which is the United States Consumer Price Index for the state fiscal year ending the tax year prior to the tax year for which the adjustment is being made and the denominator of which is the United States Consumer Price Index for the 1998-1999 state fiscal year. The resultant product shall be rounded to the nearest $100.00 increment. (8) As used in this section, "retirement or pension benefits" means distributions from all of the following: (a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), qualified pension trusts and annuity plans that qualify under section 401(a) of the internal revenue code, including all of the following: (i) Plans for self-employed persons, commonly known as Keogh or HR10 plans. (ii) Individual retirement accounts that qualify under section 408 of the internal revenue code if the distributions are not made until the participant has reached 59-1/2 years of age, except in the case of death, disability, or distributions described by section 72(t)(2)(A)(iv) of the internal revenue code. (iii) Employee annuities or tax-sheltered annuities purchased under section 403(b) of the internal revenue code by organizations exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, or by public school systems. (iv) Distributions from a 401(k) plan attributable to employee contributions mandated by the plan or attributable to employer contributions. (b) The following retirement and pension plans not qualified under the internal revenue code: (i) Plans of the United States, state governments other than this state, and political subdivisions, agencies, or instrumentalities of this state. (ii) Plans maintained by a church or a convention or association of churches. (iii) All other unqualified pension plans that prescribe eligibility for retirement and predetermine contributions and benefits if the distributions are made from a pension trust. (c) Retirement or pension benefits received by a surviving spouse if those benefits qualified for a deduction prior to the decedent's death. Benefits received by a surviving child are not deductible. (d) Retirement and pension benefits do not include: (i) Amounts received from a plan that allows the employee to set the amount of compensation to be deferred and does not prescribe retirement age or years of service. These plans include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (A) Deferred compensation plans under section 457 of the internal revenue code. (B) Distributions from plans under section 401(k) of the internal revenue code other than plans described in subdivision (a)(iv). (C) Distributions from plans under section 403(b) of the internal revenue code other than plans described in subdivision (a)(iii). (ii) Premature distributions paid on separation, withdrawal, or discontinuance of a plan prior to the earliest date the recipient could have retired under the provisions of the plan. (iii) Payments received as an incentive to retire early unless the distributions are from a pension trust. (9) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) or (11), in determining taxable income under this section, the following limitations and restrictions apply: (a) For a person born before 1946, this subsection provides no additional restrictions or limitations under subsection (1)(f). (b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for a person born in 1946 through 1952, the sum of the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return. After that person reaches the age of 67, the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) do not apply and that person is eligible for a deduction of $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return, which deduction is available against all types of income and is not restricted to income from retirement or pension benefits. A person who takes the deduction under subsection (1)(e) is not eligible for the unrestricted deduction of $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return under this subdivision. (c) Beginning January 1, 2013 for a person born in 1946 through 1952 and beginning January 1, 2018 for a person born after 1945 who has retired as of January 1, 2013, if that person receives retirement or pension benefits from employment with a governmental agency that was not covered by the federal social security act, chapter 531, 49 Stat 620, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, the sum of the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $35,000.00 for a single return and, except as otherwise provided under this subdivision, $55,000.00 for a joint return. If both spouses filing a joint return receive retirement or pension benefits from employment with a governmental agency that was not covered by the federal social security act, chapter 531, 49 Stat 620, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, the sum of the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $70,000.00 for a joint return. After that person reaches the age of 67, the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) do not apply and that person is eligible for a deduction of $35,000.00 for a single return and $55,000.00 for a joint return, or $70,000.00 for a joint return if applicable, which deduction is available against all types of income and is not restricted to income from retirement or pension benefits. A person who takes the deduction under subsection (1)(e) is not eligible for the unrestricted deduction of $35,000.00 for a single return and $55,000.00 for a joint return, or $70,000.00 for a joint return if applicable, under this subdivision. (d) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (c) for a person who was retired as of January 1, 2013, for a person born after 1952 who has reached the age of 62 through 66 years of age and who receives retirement or pension benefits from employment with a governmental agency that was not covered by the federal social security act, chapter 531, 49 Stat 620, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, the sum of the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $15,000.00 for a single return and, except as otherwise provided under this subdivision, $15,000.00 for a joint return. If both spouses filing a joint return receive retirement or pension benefits from employment with a governmental agency that was not covered by the federal social security act, chapter 531, 49 Stat 620, 42 USC 301 to 1397mm, the sum of the deductions under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), and (iv) is limited to $30,000.00 for a joint return. (e) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (c) or (d), for a person born after 1952, the deduction under subsection (1)(f)(i), (ii), or (iv) does not apply. When that person reaches the age of 67, that person is eligible for a deduction of $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return, which deduction is available against all types of income and is not restricted to income from retirement or pension benefits. If a person takes the deduction of $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return, that person shall not take the deduction under subsection (1)(f)(iii) and shall not take the personal exemption under subsection (2). That person may elect not to take the deduction of $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return and elect to take the deduction under subsection (1)(f)(iii) and the personal exemption under subsection (2) if that election would reduce that person's tax liability. A person who takes the deduction under subsection (1)(e) is not eligible for the unrestricted deduction of $20,000.00 for a single return and $40,000.00 for a joint return under this subdivision. (f) For a joint return, the limitations and restrictions in this subsection shall be applied based on the date of birth of the older spouse filing the joint return. If a deduction under subsection (1)(f) was claimed on a joint return for a tax year in which a spouse died and the surviving spouse has not remarried since the death of that spouse, the surviving spouse is entitled to claim the deduction under subsection (1)(f) in subsequent tax years subject to the same restrictions and limitations, for a single return, that would have applied based on the date of birth of the older of the 2 spouses. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2019, a surviving spouse born after 1945 who has reached the age of 67 and has not remarried since the death of that spouse may elect to take the deduction that is available against all types of income subject to the same limitations and restrictions as provided under this subsection based on the surviving spouse's date of birth instead of taking the deduction allowed under subsection (1)(f), for a single return, based on the date of birth of the older spouse. (10) In determining taxable income under this section, a taxpayer may elect to deduct retirement or pension benefits as provided under subsection (1)(f) with the following limitations and restrictions or elect to apply the limitations and restrictions in subsection (9), or subsection (11) if applicable: (a) For the 2023 tax year, a taxpayer who was born after 1945 and before 1959 may deduct an amount of retirement or pension benefits not to exceed 25% of the maximum amount of retirement or pension benefits that the taxpayer would be allowed to deduct for the tax year under subsection (1)(f)(iv) if the taxpayer's retirement or pension benefits were subject to the limitations of that subsection only. (b) For the 2024 tax year, a taxpayer who was born after 1945 and before 1963 may deduct an amount of retirement or pension benefits not to exceed 50% of the maximum amount of retirement or pension benefits that the taxpayer would be allowed to deduct for the tax year under subsection (1)(f)(iv) if the taxpayer's retirement or pension benefits were subject to the limitations of that subsection only. (c) For the 2025 tax year, a taxpayer who was born after 1945 and before 1967 may deduct an amount of retirement or pension benefits not to exceed 75% of the maximum amount of retirement or pension benefits that the taxpayer would be allowed to deduct for the tax year under subsection (1)(f)(iv) if the taxpayer's retirement or pension benefits were subject to the limitations of that subsection only. (d) For the 2026 tax year and each tax year after 2026, a taxpayer may deduct retirement or pension benefits as provided under subsection (1)(f), except that the amounts deductible under subsection (1)(f)(i) and (ii) combined are subject to the same maximum amounts allowed under subsection (1)(f)(iv) for a single return and a joint return for that same tax year. (e) For a joint return, the limitations and restrictions in this subsection shall be applied based on the date of birth of the older spouse filing the joint return. If a deduction under subsection (1)(f) was claimed on a joint return for a tax year in which a spouse died and the surviving spouse has not remarried since the death of that spouse, the surviving spouse is entitled to claim the deduction under subsection (1)(f) in subsequent tax years subject to the same restrictions and limitations under this subsection, for a single return, that would have applied based on the date of birth of the older of the 2 spouses. (11) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2023, in determining taxable income under this section, a taxpayer with retirement or pension benefits received for services as a public police or fire department employee subject to 1969 PA 312, MCL 423.231 to 423.247, a state police trooper or state police sergeant subject to 1980 PA 17, MCL 423.271 to 423.287, or a corrections officer employed by a county sheriff in a county jail, work camp, or other facility maintained by a county that houses adult prisoners may elect to deduct retirement or pension benefits as provided under subsection (1)(f) without any additional limitations or restrictions or elect to apply the limitations and restrictions in subsection (9) or (10). (12) As used in this section: (a) "Oil and gas" means oil and gas subject to severance tax under 1929 PA 48, MCL 205.301 to 205.317. (b) "Senior citizen" means that term as defined in section 514. (c) "United States Consumer Price Index" means the United States Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers as defined and reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. Sec. 701. As used in this chapter: (a) "Casino" means that term as defined in section 110. (b) "Casino licensee" means a person licensed to operate a casino under the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. (c) "Eligible production company" means that term as defined under section 455 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1455. (d) "Flow-through entity" means an entity that for the applicable tax year is treated as an S corporation under section 1362(a) of the internal revenue code, a general partnership, a limited partnership, a limited liability partnership, or a limited liability company, that for the applicable tax year is not taxed as a corporation for federal income tax purposes. Flow-through entity does not include any entity disregarded or treated as a corporation under section 699. (e) "Member" means a shareholder of an S corporation, a partner in a general partnership, a limited partnership, or a limited liability partnership, a member of a limited liability company, or a beneficiary of a trust, that is a flow-through entity. (f) "Nonresident" means an individual who is not a resident of or domiciled in this state, a business entity that does not have its commercial domicile in this state, or a trust not organized in this state. (g) "Overtime compensation" means compensation required to be paid to the employee by the employer under section 4a of the improved workforce opportunity wage act, 2018 PA 337, MCL 408.934a. (h) (g) "Partnership" means a taxpayer that is required to or has elected to file as a partnership for federal income tax purposes. (i) (h) "Publicly traded partnership" means that term as defined under section 7704 of the internal revenue code. (j) (i) "Race meeting licensee" and "track licensee" mean a person to whom a race meeting license or track license is issued pursuant to section 8 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.308. (k) (j) "S corporation" means a corporation electing taxation under sections 1361 to 1379 of the internal revenue code. Sec. 703. (1) A person who disburses pension or annuity payments, except as otherwise provided under this section, shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 on the taxable part of payments from an employer pension, annuity, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or other deferred compensation plan as well as from an individual retirement arrangement, an annuity, an endowment, or a life insurance contract issued by a life insurance company. Withholding shall be calculated on the taxable disbursement after deducting from the taxable portion the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individual allowed under this act. Withholding is not required on any part of a distribution that is not expected to be includable in the recipient's gross income or that is deductible from adjusted gross income under section 30(1)(e) or (f). (2) Every employer in this state required under the provisions of the internal revenue code to withhold a tax on the compensation of an individual, except as otherwise provided, shall deduct and withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying, except as provided by subsection (14), the rate prescribed in section 51 to the remainder of the compensation after deducting from compensation the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individual allowed under this act that the period of time covered by the compensation is of 1 year and beginning on and after January 1, 2026, after deducting from compensation any overtime compensation. The department may prescribe withholding tables that may be used by employers to compute the amount of tax required to be withheld. (3) Except as otherwise provided under this section, for tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, every flow-through entity in this state shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to the distributive share of taxable income reasonably expected to accrue after allocation and apportionment under chapter 3 of each nonresident member who is an individual after deducting from that distributive income the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individual allowed under this act. All of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on April 15, July 15, and October 15 of the flow-through entity's tax year and January 15 of the following year, except a flow-through entity that is not on a calendar year basis shall substitute the appropriate due dates in the flow-through entity's fiscal year that correspond to those in a calendar year. Withholding for each period shall be equal to 1/4 of the total withholding calculated on the distributive share that is reasonably expected to accrue during the tax year of the flow-through entity. (4) Except as otherwise provided under this section, for tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, every flow-through entity with business activity in this state that has more than $200,000.00 of business income reasonably expected to accrue in the tax year after allocation or apportionment shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 623 to the distributive share of the business income of each member that is a corporation or that is a flow-through entity. For purposes of calculating the $200,000.00 withholding threshold, the business income of a flow-through entity shall be apportioned to this state by multiplying the business income by the sales factor of the flow-through entity. The sales factor of the flow-through entity is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total sales of the flow-through entity in this state during the tax year and the denominator of which is the total sales of the flow-through entity everywhere during the tax year. As used in this subsection, "business income" means that term as defined in section 603(2). 603. For a partnership or S corporation, business income includes payments and items of income and expense that are attributable to business activity of the partnership or S corporation and separately reported to the members. As used in this subsection, "sales" means that term as defined in section 609 and sales in this state is determined as provided in sections 665 and 669. All of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on April 15, July 15, and October 15 of the flow-through entity's tax year and January 15 of the following year, except a flow-through entity that is not on a calendar year basis shall substitute the appropriate due dates in the flow-through entity's fiscal year that correspond to those in a calendar year. Withholding for each period shall be equal to 1/4 of the total withholding calculated on the distributive share of business income that is reasonably expected to accrue during the tax year of the flow-through entity. (5) For tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, if a flow-through entity is subject to the withholding requirements of subsection (4), then a member of that flow-through entity that is itself a flow-through entity shall withhold a tax on the distributive share of business income as described in subsection (4) of each of its members. The department shall apply tax withheld by a flow-through entity on the distributive share of business income of a member flow-through entity to the withholding required of that member flow-through entity. All of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on April 15, July 15, and October 15 of the flow-through entity's tax year and January 15 of the following year, except a flow-through entity that is not on a calendar year basis shall substitute the appropriate due dates in the flow-through entity's fiscal year that correspond to those in a calendar year. Withholding for each period shall be equal to 1/4 of the total withholding calculated on the distributive share of business income that is reasonably expected to accrue during the tax year of the flow-through entity. (6) Every casino licensee shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to the winnings of a nonresident reportable by the casino licensee under the internal revenue code. (7) Every race meeting licensee or track licensee shall withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to a payoff price on a winning ticket of a nonresident reportable by the race meeting licensee or track licensee under the internal revenue code that is the result of pari-mutuel wagering at a licensed race meeting. (8) Every casino licensee or race meeting licensee or track licensee shall report winnings of a resident reportable by the casino licensee or race meeting licensee or track licensee under the internal revenue code to the department in the same manner and format as required under the internal revenue code. (9) Every eligible production company shall, to the extent not withheld by a professional services corporation or professional employer organization, deduct and withhold a tax in an amount computed by applying the rate prescribed in section 51 to the remainder of the payments made to the professional services corporation or professional employer organization for the services of a performing artist or crew member after deducting from those payments the same proportion of the total amount of personal and dependency exemptions of the individuals allowed under this act. (10) Every publicly traded partnership that has equity securities registered with the securities and exchange commission under section 12 of title I of the securities and exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78l, shall not be subject to withholding. (11) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, all of the taxes withheld under this section shall accrue to the state on the last day of the month in which the taxes are withheld but shall be returned and paid to the department by the employer, eligible production company, casino licensee, or race meeting licensee or track licensee within 15 days after the end of any month or as provided in section 705. For an employer that has entered into an agreement with a community college pursuant to chapter 13 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.161 to 389.166, a portion of the taxes withheld under this section that are attributable to each employee in a new job created pursuant to the agreement shall accrue to the community college on the last day of the month in which the taxes are withheld but shall be returned and paid to the community college by the employer within 15 days after the end of any month or as provided in section 705 for as long as the agreement remains in effect. For purposes of this act and 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, payments made by an employer to a community college under this subsection shall be considered income taxes paid to this state. (12) A person required by this section to deduct and withhold taxes on income under this section holds the amount of tax withheld as a trustee for this state and is liable for the payment of the tax to this state or, if applicable, to the community college and is not liable to any individual for the amount of the payment. (13) An employer in this state is not required to deduct and withhold a tax on the compensation paid to a nonresident individual employee, who, under section 256, may claim a tax credit equal to or in excess of the tax estimated to be due for the tax year or is exempted from liability for the tax imposed by this act. In each tax year, the nonresident individual shall furnish to the employer, on a form approved by the department, a verified statement of nonresidence. (14) A person required to withhold a tax under this act, by the fifteenth day of the following month, shall provide the department with a copy of any exemption certificate on which a person with income subject to withholding under subsection (6) or (7) claims more than 9 personal or dependency exemptions, claims a status that exempts the person subject to withholding under subsection (6) or (7) from withholding under this section. (15) A person who disburses annuity payments pursuant to the terms of a qualified charitable gift annuity is not required to deduct and withhold a tax on those payments as prescribed under subsection (1). As used in this subsection, "qualified charitable gift annuity" means an annuity described under section 501(m)(5) of the internal revenue code and issued by an organization exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. (16) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (4) and (5), if a flow-through entity receives an exemption certificate from a member other than a nonresident individual, the flow-through entity shall not withhold a tax on the distributive share of the business income of that member if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The exemption certificate is completed by the member in the form and manner prescribed by the department and certifies that the member will do all of the following: (i) File the returns required under this act. (ii) Pay or withhold the tax required under this act on the distributive share of the business income received from any flow-through entity in which the member has an ownership or beneficial interest, directly or indirectly through 1 or more other flow-through entities. (iii) Submit to the taxing jurisdiction of this state for purposes of collection of the tax under this act together with related interest and penalties under 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, imposed on the member with respect to the distributive share of the business income of that member. (b) The department may require the member to file the exemption certificate with the department and provide a copy to the flow-through entity. (c) The department may require a flow-through entity that receives an exemption certificate to attach a copy of the exemption certificate to the annual reconciliation return as required by section 711. A flow-through entity that is entirely exempt from the withholding requirements of subsection (4) or (5) by this subsection may be required to furnish a copy of the exemption certificate in another manner prescribed by the department. (d) A copy of the exemption certificate shall be retained by the member and flow-through entity and made available to the department upon request. Any copy of the exemption certificate shall be maintained in a format and for the period required by 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31. (17) The department may revoke the election provided for in subsection (16) if it determines that the member or a flow-through entity is not abiding by the terms of the exemption certificate or the requirements of subsection (16). If the department does revoke the election option under subsection (16), the department shall notify the affected flow-through entity that withholding is required on the member under subsection (4) or (5), beginning 60 days after notice of revocation is received. (18) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (4) and (5), a flow-through entity is not required to withhold in accordance with this section for a member that voluntarily elects to file a return and pay the tax imposed by the Michigan business tax act under section 680 or section 500 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1500. (19) Notwithstanding the withholding requirements of subsection (3), (4), or (5), a flow-through entity is not required to comply with those withholding requirements to the extent that the withholding would violate any of the following: (a) Housing assistance payment programs distribution restrictions under 24 CFR part 880, 881, 883, or 891. (b) Rural housing service return on investment restrictions under 7 CFR 3560.68 or 3560.305. (c) Articles of incorporation or other document of organization adopted pursuant to section 83 or 93 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1483 and 125.1493. Sec. 711. (1) Every person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes for a tax year on income other than distributive share of income from a flow-through entity shall furnish to the person who received the income a statement in duplicate on or before January 31 of the succeeding year of the total income paid during the tax year and the amount deducted or withheld. However, if employment is terminated before the close of a calendar year by a person that goes out of business or permanently ceases to exist, then the statement required by this subsection shall be issued within 30 days after the last compensation, winnings, or payoff of a winning ticket is paid. For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2026, the statement required under this subsection must delineate the amount of overtime compensation that was paid during the tax year. A duplicate of a statement made pursuant to this section and an annual reconciliation return, MI-W3, shall be filed with the department by February 28 of the succeeding year for tax years before the 2018 tax year and by January 31 of the succeeding year for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018 except that a person that goes out of business or permanently ceases to exist shall file the statement and the annual reconciliation return within 30 days after going out of business or permanently ceasing to exist. For tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, a flow-through entity that was required to withhold taxes on distributive shares of business income shall file an annual reconciliation return with the department no later than the last day of the second month following the end of the flow-through entity's federal tax year. The department may require a flow-through entity to file an annual business income information return with the department on the due date, including extensions, of its annual federal information return. (2) Every person required by this part to deduct or withhold taxes shall make a return or report in form and content and at times as prescribed by the department. An employer that has more than 250 employees shall file its annual return or report required under this section in electronic form. An employer that has entered into an agreement with a community college pursuant to chapter 13 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.161 to 389.166, and is required to deduct or withhold taxes from compensation and make payments to a community college pursuant to the agreement for a portion of those taxes withheld shall, for as long as the agreement remains in effect, delineate in the return or report required under this subsection between the amount deducted or withheld and paid to the state and that amount paid to a community college. An employer that has entered into a written agreement pursuant to the good jobs for Michigan program created under section 90h of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090h, shall, for as long as the written agreement remains in effect, delineate in the return or report required under this subsection the portion of those taxes withheld and paid to the state that are attributable to certified new jobs. For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2026, an employer shall delineate in the return or report required under this subsection the aggregate amount of overtime compensation deducted and excluded from withholding under section 703(2). (3) Every person who receives income subject to withholding under this part shall furnish to the person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes information required to make an accurate withholding. A person who receives income subject to withholding under this part shall file with the person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes revised information within 10 days after a decrease in the number of exemptions or a change in status from a nonresident to a resident. The person who receives income subject to withholding under this part may file revised information when the number of exemptions increases or when a change in status occurs from that of a resident of this state to a nonresident of this state. Revised information shall not be given retroactive effect for withholding purposes. A person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes shall rely on this information for withholding purposes unless directed by the department to withhold on some other basis. If a person who receives income subject to withholding under this part fails or refuses to furnish information, the person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes shall withhold at the full rate of tax from the person's income subject to withholding under this part.